Vermont, session 2025-2026, H703.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 3281 is amended to read:
§ 3281. SEXUAL ASSAULT SURVIVORS’ RIGHTS
(a) Short title. This section may be cited as the “Bill of Rights for Sexual
Assault Survivors.”
(b) Definition. As used in this section, “sexual assault survivor” means a
person who is a victim of an alleged sexual offense.
(c) Survivors’ rights. When a sexual assault survivor makes a verbal or
written report to a law enforcement officer, emergency department, sexual
assault nurse examiner, or victim’s advocate of an alleged sexual offense, the
recipient of the report shall provide written notification to the survivor that the
survivor has the following rights:
(1) The right to receive a medical forensic examination and any related
toxicology testing at no cost to the survivor in accordance with 32 V.S.A.
§ 1407, irrespective of whether the survivor reports to or cooperates with law
enforcement. If the survivor opts to have a medical forensic examination, the
survivor shall have the following additional rights:
(A) the right to have the medical forensic examination kit or its
probative contents delivered to a forensics laboratory within 72 hours of after
collection;
VT LEG #386320 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.703
2026 Page 3 of 5
(B) the right to have the sexual assault evidence collection kit or its
probative contents preserved without charge for the duration of the maximum
applicable statute of limitations;
(C) the right to not have any evidence collected pursuant to an
examination used to prosecute the survivor for any misdemeanor or a violation
of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84 or used as the basis for a warrant to search for any
evidence of any unrelated misdemeanor or violation of 18 V.S.A. chapter 84
that may have been committed by the survivor;
(D) the right to be informed in writing of all policies governing the
collection, storage, preservation, and disposal of a sexual assault evidence
collection kit;
(D)(E) the right to be informed of a DNA profile match on a kit
reported to law enforcement or on a confidential kit, on a toxicology report, or
on a medical record documenting a medical forensic examination, if the
disclosure would not impede or compromise an ongoing investigation;
(E)(F) the right to be informed of the status and location of the sexual
assault evidence collection kit; and
(F)(G) upon written request from the survivor, the right to:
(i) receive written notification from the appropriate official with
custody not later than 60 days before the date of the kit’s intended destruction
or disposal; and
VT LEG #386320 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.703
2026 Page 4 of 5
(ii) be granted further preservation of the kit or its probative
contents.
(2) The right to consult with a sexual assault advocate.
(3) The right to information concerning the availability of protective
orders and policies related to the enforcement of protective orders.
(4) The right to information about the availability of, and eligibility for,
victim compensation and restitution.
(5) The right to information about confidentiality.
(6) The right to have a support person of the survivor’s choosing present
during any medical forensic examination. If attendance of the support person
will require a significant delay in conducting the examination, the survivor
shall be advised of the potential consequences of a delay.
(7) The right to have a support person of the survivor’s choosing present
during any interview by a law enforcement officer, prosecutor, or defense
attorney.
(8) The right to take a shower immediately after the medical forensic
examination at no cost to the survivor unless shower facilities are not available.
(9) The right to be interviewed by a law enforcement officer who is the
same gender as the survivor, if requested by the survivor. If a law enforcement
officer of the same gender is not available within a reasonable time period, the
VT LEG #386320 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.703
2026 Page 5 of 5
survivor may consent to such interview or defer until a law enforcement officer
of the same gender is available.
(10) The right to have private counsel present at any stage of the
criminal investigation and any subsequent criminal proceedings. The
survivor’s choice to employ private counsel shall not disadvantage the survivor
in any manner throughout the criminal justice process.
(d) Notification protocols. The Vermont Network Against Domestic and
Sexual Violence and the Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program, in
consultation with other parties referred to in this section, shall develop
protocols and written materials to assist all responsible entities in providing
notification to victims.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386320 v.1